Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1237.
do enact as follows:AB1237,11Section 1. 20.9315 of the statutes is created to read:AB1237,2,3220.9315 False claims for medical assistance; actions by or on behalf of 3state. (1) In this section:AB1237,2,44(a) “Claim” has the meaning given in 31 USC 3729 (b) (2).AB1237,2,85(b) “Knowingly” means, with respect to information, having actual knowledge 6of the information, acting in deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the 7information, or acting in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information. 8“Knowingly” does not mean specifically intending to defraud.AB1237,2,109(c) “Material” means having a natural tendency to influence, or be capable of 10influencing, the payment or receipt of money or property.AB1237,2,1111(d) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given under s. 49.43 (8).AB1237,2,1212(e) “Obligation” has the meaning given in 31 USC 3729 (b) (3).AB1237,2,1313(f) “Original source” has the meaning given in 31 USC 3730 (e) (4) (B).AB1237,3,31(g) “Proceeds” includes damages, civil penalties, surcharges, payments for 2costs of compliance, and any other economic benefit realized by this state as a result 3of an action or settlement of a claim.AB1237,3,84(2) Except as provided in sub. (3), any person who does any of the following is 5liable to this state for 3 times the amount of the damages that were sustained by the 6state or would have been sustained by the state, whichever is greater, because of the 7actions of the person and shall forfeit, for each violation, an amount within the 8range specified under 31 USC 3729 (a):AB1237,3,109(a) Knowingly presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim 10for medical assistance.AB1237,3,1211(b) Knowingly makes, uses, or causes to be made or used a false record or 12statement material to a false or fraudulent claim for medical assistance.AB1237,3,1713(dg) Knowingly makes, uses, or causes to be made or used a false record or 14statement material to an obligation to pay or transmit money or property to the 15Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49 or knowingly conceals or 16knowingly and improperly avoids or decreases an obligation to pay or transmit 17money or property to the Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49.AB1237,3,1818(dr) Conspires to commit a violation under par. (a), (b), or (dg).AB1237,3,2219(3) The court may assess against a person who violates sub. (2) not less than 202 nor more than 3 times the amount of the damages sustained by the state because 21of the acts of the person, and shall not assess any forfeiture, if the court finds all of 22the following:AB1237,4,223(a) The person who commits the acts furnished the attorney general with all 1information known to the person about the acts within 30 days after the date on 2which the person obtained the information.AB1237,4,33(b) The person fully cooperated with any investigation by this state of the acts.AB1237,4,84(c) At the time that the person furnished the attorney general with 5information concerning the acts, no criminal prosecution or civil or administrative 6enforcement action had been commenced with respect to any such act, and the 7person did not have actual knowledge of the existence of any investigation into any 8such act.AB1237,4,119(5) (a) Except as provided in subs. (10) and (12), any person may bring a civil 10action as a qui tam plaintiff against a person who commits an act in violation of sub. 11(2) for the person and the state in the name of the state.AB1237,4,2012(b) The plaintiff under par. (a) shall serve upon the attorney general a copy of 13the complaint and documents disclosing substantially all material evidence and 14information that the plaintiff possesses. The plaintiff shall file a copy of the 15complaint with the court for inspection in camera. Except as provided in par. (c), 16the complaint shall remain under seal for a period of 60 days from the date of filing 17and shall not be served upon the defendant until the court so orders. Within 60 18days from the date of service upon the attorney general of the complaint, evidence, 19and information under this paragraph, the attorney general may intervene in the 20action.AB1237,5,221(bm) Any complaint filed by the state in intervention, whether filed separately 22or as an amendment to the qui tam plaintiff’s complaint, shall relate back to the 23filing date of the qui tam plaintiff’s complaint to the extent that the state’s claim 1arises out of the conduct, transactions, or occurrences set forth, or attempted to be 2set forth, in the qui tam plaintiff’s complaint.AB1237,5,53(c) The attorney general may, for good cause shown, move the court for one or 4more extensions of the period during which a complaint in an action under this 5subsection remains under seal.AB1237,5,76(d) Before the expiration of the period during which the complaint remains 7under seal, the attorney general shall do one of the following:AB1237,5,981. Proceed with the action or an alternate remedy under sub. (10), in which 9case the action or proceeding under sub. (10) shall be prosecuted by the state.AB1237,5,11102. Notify the court that he or she declines to proceed with the action, in which 11case the person bringing the action may proceed with the action.AB1237,5,1412(e) If a person brings a valid action under this subsection, no person other 13than the state may intervene or bring a related action based upon the same facts 14underlying the original action while the original action is pending.AB1237,5,1715(f) In any action brought under this subsection or other proceeding under sub. 16(10), the plaintiff is required to prove all essential elements of the cause of action or 17complaint, including damages, by a preponderance of the evidence.AB1237,5,2218(6) If the state proceeds with an action under sub. (5) or an alternate remedy 19under sub. (10), the state has primary responsibility for prosecuting the action 20under sub. (5) or proceeding under sub. (10). The state is not bound by any act of 21the person bringing the action, but that person has the right to continue as a party 22to the action.AB1237,6,723(7) (b) With the approval of the governor, the attorney general may 1compromise and settle an action under sub. (5) or an administrative proceeding 2under sub. (10) to which the state is a party, notwithstanding objection of the 3person bringing the action, if the court determines, after affording to the person 4bringing the action the right to a hearing at which the person is allowed the 5opportunity to present evidence in opposition to the proposed settlement, that the 6proposed settlement is fair, adequate, and reasonable considering the relevant 7circumstances pertaining to the violation.AB1237,6,148(c) Upon a showing by the state that unrestricted participation in the 9prosecution of an action under sub. (5) or an alternate proceeding under sub. (10) to 10which the state is a party by the person bringing the action would interfere with or 11unduly delay the prosecution of the action or proceeding, or would result in 12consideration of repetitious or irrelevant evidence or evidence presented for 13purposes of harassment, the court may limit the person’s participation in the 14prosecution, such as:AB1237,6,15151. Limiting the number of witnesses that the person may call.AB1237,6,16162. Limiting the length of the testimony of the witnesses.AB1237,6,17173. Limiting the cross-examination of witnesses by the person.AB1237,6,19184. Otherwise limiting the participation by the person in the prosecution of the 19action or proceeding.AB1237,7,220(d) Upon a showing by a defendant that unrestricted participation in the 21prosecution of an action under sub. (5) or alternate proceeding under sub. (10) to 22which the state is a party by the person bringing the action would result in 1harassment or would cause the defendant undue burden or unnecessary expense, 2the court may limit the person’s participation in the prosecution.AB1237,7,103(8) Except as provided in sub. (7), if the state elects not to participate in an 4action filed under sub. (5), the person bringing the action may prosecute the action. 5If the attorney general so requests, the attorney general shall, at the state’s 6expense, be served with copies of all pleadings and deposition transcripts in the 7action. If the person bringing the action initiates prosecution of the action, the 8court, without limiting the status and rights of that person, may permit the state to 9intervene at a later date upon a showing by the state of good cause for the proposed 10intervention.AB1237,7,2011(9) Whether or not the state participates in an action under sub. (5), upon a 12showing in camera by the attorney general that discovery by the person bringing 13the action would interfere with the state’s ongoing investigation or prosecution of a 14criminal or civil matter arising out of the same facts as the facts upon which the 15action is based, the court may stay such discovery in whole or in part for a period of 16not more than 60 days. The court may extend the period of any such stay upon a 17further showing in camera by the attorney general that the state has pursued the 18criminal or civil investigation of the matter with reasonable diligence and the 19proposed discovery in the action brought under sub. (5) will interfere with the 20ongoing criminal or civil investigation or prosecution.AB1237,8,1021(10) The attorney general may pursue a claim relating to an alleged violation 22of sub. (2) through an alternate remedy available to the state or any state agency, 23including an administrative proceeding to assess a civil forfeiture. If the attorney 1general elects any such alternate remedy, the attorney general shall serve timely 2notice of his or her election upon the person bringing the action under sub. (5), and 3that person has the same rights in the alternate venue as the person would have 4had if the action had continued under sub. (5). Any finding of fact or conclusion of 5law made by a court or by a state agency in the alternate venue that has become 6final is conclusive upon all parties named in an action under sub. (5). For purposes 7of this subsection, a finding or conclusion is final if it has been finally determined 8on appeal, if all time for filing an appeal or petition for review with respect to the 9finding or conclusion has expired, or if the finding or conclusion is not subject to 10judicial review.AB1237,8,1611(11) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (e), if the state proceeds with an 12action brought by a person under sub. (5) or the state pursues an alternate remedy 13relating to the same acts under sub. (10), the person who brings the action shall 14receive at least 15 percent but not more than 25 percent of the proceeds of the action 15or settlement of the claim, depending upon the extent to which the person 16contributed to the prosecution of the action or claim.AB1237,9,317(b) Except as provided in par. (e), if an action or claim is one that the court or 18other adjudicator finds to be based primarily upon disclosures of specific 19information not provided by the person who brings the action or claim under sub. 20(5) relating to allegations or transactions specifically disclosed in a criminal, civil, 21or administrative hearing; legislative or administrative report, hearing, audit, or 22investigation; or report made by the news media, the court or other adjudicator may 23award an amount to the person as it considers appropriate, but not more than 10 1percent of the proceeds of the action or settlement of the claim, depending upon the 2significance of the information and the role of the person bringing the action in 3advancing the prosecution of the action or claim.AB1237,9,84(c) Except as provided in par. (e), in addition to any amount received under 5par. (a) or (b), a person bringing an action under sub. (5) shall be awarded his or her 6reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in bringing the action together with the 7person’s costs and reasonable actual attorney fees. The court or other adjudicator 8shall assess any award under this paragraph against the defendant.AB1237,9,159(d) Except as provided in par. (e), if the state does not proceed with an action 10under sub. (5) or an alternate proceeding under sub. (10), the person bringing the 11action shall receive an amount that the court decides is reasonable for collection of 12the civil penalty and damages. The amount shall be not less than 25 percent and 13not more than 30 percent of the proceeds of the action and shall be paid from the 14proceeds. In addition, the person shall be paid his or her expenses, costs, and fees 15under par. (c).AB1237,9,2316(e) Whether or not the state proceeds with an action under sub. (5) or an 17alternate proceeding under sub. (10), if the court or other adjudicator finds that an 18action under sub. (5) was brought by a person who planned or initiated the violation 19upon which the action or proceeding is based, then the court may, to the extent that 20the court considers appropriate, reduce the share of the proceeds of the action that 21the person would otherwise receive under par. (a), (b), or (d), taking into account the 22role of that person in advancing the prosecution of the action or claim and any other 23relevant circumstance pertaining to the violation, except that if the person bringing 1the action is convicted of criminal conduct arising from his or her role in a violation 2of sub. (2), the court or other adjudicator shall dismiss the person as a party and the 3person shall not receive any share of the proceeds of the action or claim or any 4expenses, costs, or fees under par. (c).AB1237,10,95(12) Except if the action is brought by the attorney general or the person 6bringing the action is an original source of the information, the court shall dismiss 7an action or claim under this section, unless opposed by the state, if substantially 8the same allegations or transactions as alleged in the action or claim were publicly 9disclosed in any of the following ways: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1237 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1237 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1237 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1237 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1237: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting